District of Columbia statutes.
49-1101.10

Powers and duties of the Interstate Commission.

The Interstate Commission shall have the power to:

(1)

Provide for dispute resolution among member states;

(2)

Promulgate rules and take all necessary actions to effect its goals, purposes, and obligations as enumerated in this compact; which rules shall have the force and effect of statutory law and shall be binding in the compact states to the extent and in the manner provided in this compact;

(3)

Issue, upon request of a member state, advisory opinions concerning the meaning or interpretation of the compact, its bylaws, rules, or actions;

(4)

Enforce compliance with the compact provisions, the rules promulgated by the Interstate Commission, and the bylaws using all necessary and proper means, including the use of the judicial process;

(5)

Establish and maintain offices, which shall be located within one or more of the member states;

(6)

Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;

(7)

Borrow, accept, hire, or contract for services of personnel;

(8)

Establish and appoint committees, including the executive committee required by § 49-1101.09(b)(5), which shall have the power to act on behalf of the Interstate Commission in carrying out its powers and duties;

(9)

Elect or appoint officers, attorneys, employees, agents, or consultants, and to fix their compensation, define their duties, and determine their qualifications, and to establish the Interstate Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, rates of compensation, and qualifications of personnel;

(10)

Accept any and all donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and to receive, utilize, and dispose of the same;

(11)

Lease, purchase, accept contributions or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve, or use any property, real, personal, or mixed;

(12)

Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed;

(13)

Establish a budget and make expenditures;

(14)

Adopt a seal and bylaws governing the management and operation of the Interstate Commission;

(15)

Report annually to the legislatures, governors, the Mayor of the District of Columbia, judiciary, and state councils of the member states concerning the activities of the Interstate Commission during the preceding year, including any recommendations that may have been adopted by the Interstate Commission;

(16)

Coordinate education, training, and public awareness regarding the compact, its implementation, and operation for officials and parents involved in compact activities;

(17)

Establish uniform standards for the reporting, collecting, and exchanging of data;

(18)

Maintain corporate books and records in accordance with the bylaws;

(19)

Perform such functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact; and

(20)

Provide for the uniform collection and sharing of information between and among member states and the schools and military families affected under this compact.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-304, § 11, 60 DCR 2717